Texas, session 892, HB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter L, Chapter 5, Water Code, is amended by adding Section 5.517 to read as follows: Sec. 5.517.  EMERGENCY OR TEMPORARY ORDER CONCERNING DEBRIS DISPOSAL AFTER WEATHER EMERGENCY. (a)  On request of the county judge of a county, the commission may issue an emergency or temporary order under this subchapter concerning solid waste disposal or management or controlled outdoor burning of debris following a weather emergency in the county regardless of whether a state of disaster or state of emergency has been declared under state or federal law. (b)  The commission shall respond to a request for an emergency or temporary order described by Subsection (a) as soon as practicable after the commission receives the request. (c)  Section 5.502 does not apply to a request submitted under this section. SECTION 2.  Section 5.517, Water Code, as added by this Act, applies to a weather emergency occurring before, on, or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.